District of Columbia statutes.
29A-301.39

Repealed

Procedure for merger.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 279, Pub. L. 87-569, § 39
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-301.39.
1981 Ed., § 29-540.
1973 Ed., § 29-1039.